Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-502
Liquid fuel carriers license; issuance.

The Department of Revenue shall issue a liquid fuel carriers license to the owner and lessee of every car, automobile, truck, trailer, vehicle, or other means of transportation using the highways for the transportation of motor vehicle fuel or diesel fuel into, within, or out of the State of Nebraska. Such licenses shall be issued by the department on receipt of applications from owners and lessees of such vehicles on forms provided by the department. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security number. Such licenses may be denied according to the provisions of section 66-729. The liquid fuel carriers license shall be valid until suspended, revoked for cause, or otherwise canceled and shall not be transferable.

Laws 1935, c. 130, § 2, p. 462;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-802;

R.S.1943, § 66-502;

Laws 1967, c. 397, § 14, p. 1253;

Laws 1969, c. 526, § 1, p. 2147;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 63;

Laws 1993, LB 440, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 82;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 150;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 33.